Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Chapter 1. State Buildings and Equipment

§ 1.
Ownership of State buildings and equipment.

The State House and the public buildings in Montpelier or elsewhere, erected or owned by the State, together with the books, furniture, equipment, paintings, statuary, and every other thing with which such house or buildings are furnished, ornamented, or supplied, shall be the property of the State.

§ 2.
Repealed.
1959, No. 328 (Adj. Sess.), § 35(c).

§ 3.
Employees of Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.

With the approval of the Governor, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services may employ at all times such help and assistance as he or she shall deem necessary for the care and upkeep of the State Capitol and other administration buildings and of all other State property committed to his or her charge by law or custom.
With the approval of the Governor, he or she shall fix the compensation and the term of service of all such employees unless otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(a);

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. April 11, 1984.

§ 4.
Civil action for damages.

When damage is done to the public buildings of the State or to the furniture or appurtenances connected therewith, the State official responsible for repair shall cause such damage to be repaired and shall immediately cause an action on this statute to be instituted in the name of the State for the recovery of such damage, with full costs, against the person doing or causing it.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(b);

1971, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 3, 1972.

§ 5.
Regulation of soliciting and advertising in State House.

A person may not distribute any advertising matter or solicit any subscription on the grounds of the State House or in other buildings owned or leased by the State, except under such regulations as shall be prescribed by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.
In the case of the interior of the State House, the regulations shall be prescribed by the Sergeant at Arms. A person who violates a provision of this section shall be fined not more than $25.00 for each offense. This section shall not apply to organized charitable campaigns authorized by the Governor and a committee appointed by the Governor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(c);

1971, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 3, 1972;

1977, No. 109

, § 28, eff. July 3, 1977;

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. April 11, 1984.

§ 6.
Visitors to State House grounds.

Except when the Legislature is in session and the Sergeant at Arms is in control of admission of persons to the State House, at such time as he or she deems proper and expedient, the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services shall admit visitors to the State House grounds.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(d);

1971, No. 213

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 3, 1972;

1983, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(b), eff. April 11, 1984.

§ 7.
Repealed. 2017, No. 111 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§§ 8-10.
Repealed.
1959, No. 328 (Adj. Sess.), § 35(c).